Illinois, session 104th, HB3556.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by 5changing Section 30-17 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 500/30-17)7    Sec. 30-17. Job order contracting.8    (a) In this Section:9    "Indefinite quantity contract" means a contract for an 10indefinite quantity of services for a fixed time or for a job 11order contract.12    "Job order contracting" means an indefinite quantity 13contract pursuant to which a contractor may perform an ongoing 14series of individual tasks at different facilities, locations, 15and sites under the jurisdiction of a State construction 16agency.17    (b) Construction agencies, including public institutions 18of higher education, may procure construction contracts via 19job order contracting through the use of competitive sealed 20bidding in accordance with Section 30-15.21(Source: P.A. 103-865, eff. 1-1-25.)